Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 40 Mail Order Sales

6-40-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mail Order Address Disclosure Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 490, § 1.

6-40-2.
Prohibitions.

It is unlawful in the sale of consumer goods or services for any person conducting a mail order or catalog business in this state, and utilizing a post office box address or a street address representing a site used primarily for the receipt or delivery of mail or as a telephone answering service, to fail to disclose the legal name under which business is done and the complete street address from which business is actually conducted in all advertising and promotional materials, including order blanks and forms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 490, § 1.

6-40-3.
Penalty.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to have committed a deceptive trade practice and is subject to the penalty set forth in §

6-13.1-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 490, § 1.